North Carolina, session 2025, SB154.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "North Carolina
CROWN Act."
SECTION 2. Article 3 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 95-28.1B. Discrimination against persons in employment.
(a) No person, firm, corporation, unincorporated association, State agency, unit of local
government, or any public or private entity shall deny or refuse employment to any person or
discharge any person from employment on account of the person's race, color, creed, religion,
sex, or national origin.
(b) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Protective hairstyles. – Includes, but is not limited to, such hairstyles as bantu
knots, braids, locks, and twists.
(2) Race. – Includes traits historically associated with race, including, but not
limited to, hair texture, hair type, and protective hairstyles."
SECTION 3. G.S. 95-241(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) No person shall discriminate or take any retaliatory action against an employee
because the employee in good faith does or threatens to do any of the following:
(1) File a claim or complaint, initiate any inquiry, investigation, inspection,
proceeding or other action, or testify or provide information to any person
with respect to any of the following:
a. Chapter 97 of the General Statutes.
b. Article 2A or Article 16 of this Chapter.
c. Article 2A of Chapter 74 of the General Statutes.
d. G.S. 95-28.1.
e. Article 16 of Chapter 127A of the General Statutes.
f. G.S. 95-28.1A.G.S. 95-28.1A or G.S. 95-28.1B.
g. Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
h. Article 5F of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(2) Cause any of the activities listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection to be
initiated on an employee's behalf.
*S154-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Exercise any right on behalf of the employee or any other employee afforded
by Article 2A or Article 16 of this Chapter, by Article 2A of Chapter 74 of the
General Statutes, or by Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
(4) Comply with the provisions of Article 27 of Chapter 7B of the General
Statutes.
(5) Exercise rights under Chapter 50B. Actions brought under this subdivision
shall be in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 50B-5.5."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to employers,
employees, and prospective employees on and after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 154-First Edition